North Carolina, session 2025, HB1091.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

TITLE OF ACT
SECTION 1. This act shall be known as "The DWI Modernization Act of 2026."

PROVISIONS RELATING TO MAGISTRATES' REQUIREMENT TO EXPLAIN A
FINDING OF NO PROBABLE CAUSE IN IMPLIED CONSENT CASES
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 15A-511 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(c1) Written Findings for Implied Consent Offense. – If the magistrate determines that
there is no probable cause for an implied consent offense, as defined in G.S. 20-16.2, the
magistrate shall provide a written explanation on a form approved by the Administrative Office
of the Courts which shall contain, at a minimum, all of the following:
(1) When performed, the result of any alcohol or other impairing substance
screening test.
(2) When performed, the results of any standardized field sobriety tests.
(3) When performed, the results of any drug recognition expert evaluation.
(4) When available, the alcohol concentration or the fact that the driver refused
the implied consent test.
*H1091-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Whether a blood sample for analysis was obtained from the defendant.
(6) The element or elements of the offense charged that the magistrate believes
are missing that led to the determination that probable cause did not exist.
A copy of the form required by this subsection shall be sent to the head of the law enforcement
agency that employed the charging officer, and to the chief district court judge and district
attorney for the judicial district, and filed with the court. The Administrative Office of the Courts
shall electronically record this data in its database and make it available upon request."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2026, and applies to
initial appearances on or after that date.

PROVISIONS RELATED TO INCREASING EFFICIENCY IN THE IMMEDIATE
CIVIL PRETRIAL REVOCATION AND ASSURING IMPAIRED DRIVERS PAY
THEIR FAIR SHARE OF THE COSTS OF PROCESSING THEM
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 20-7(i1) reads as rewritten:
"(i1) Restoration Fee. – Any person whose drivers license has been revoked pursuant to
the provisions of this Chapter, other than G.S. 20-17(a)(2) subdivision (2), (12), (13), or (14) of
subsection (a) of G.S. 20-17, shall pay a restoration fee of seventy dollars ($70.00). A person
whose drivers license has been revoked under G.S. 20-17(a)(2) subdivision (2), (12), (13), or (14)
of subsection (a) of G.S. 20-17 shall pay a restoration fee of one two hundred forty fifty dollars
and twenty-five cents ($140.25). ($250.00). The fee shall be paid to the Division prior to the
issuance to such person of a new drivers license or the restoration of the drivers license. The
restoration fee shall be paid to the Division in addition to any and all fees which may be provided
by law. This restoration fee shall not be required from any licensee whose license was revoked
or voluntarily surrendered for medical or health reasons whether or not a medical evaluation was
conducted pursuant to this Chapter. The seventy dollar ($70.00) fee, and the first one hundred
five twenty dollars ($105.00) ($120.00) of the one two hundred forty fifty dollar and twenty-five
cent ($140.25) ($250.00) fee, shall be deposited in the Highway Fund. Twenty five Sixty-five
dollars ($25.00) ($65.00) of the one two hundred forty fifty dollar and twenty-five cent ($140.25)
($250.00) fee shall be used to fund a statewide chemical alcohol impairment testing program
administered by the Forensic Tests for Alcohol Branch of the Chronic Disease and Injury Section
of the Department of Health and Human Services. The remaining sixty-five dollars ($65.00) of
the two hundred fifty dollar ($250.00) fee shall be remitted to the county for the sole purpose of
reimbursing the county for jail expenses incurred due to enforcement of the impaired driving
laws. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a restoration fee assessed pursuant to this
subsection may be waived by the Division when (i) the restoration fee remains unpaid for more
than 10 years from the date of assessment and (ii) the person responsible for payment of the
restoration fee has been issued a drivers license by the Division after the effective date of the
revocation for which the restoration fee is owed. The Office of State Budget and Management
shall annually report to the General Assembly the amount of fees deposited in the General Fund
and transferred to the Forensic Tests for Alcohol Branch of the Chronic Disease and Injury
Section of the Department of Health and Human Services under this subsection."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 20-16.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-16.2. Implied consent to chemical analysis; mandatory revocation of license in event
of refusal; right of driver to request analysis.
(a) Basis for Officer to Require Chemical Analysis; Notification of Rights. – Any person
who drives a vehicle on a highway or public vehicular area thereby gives consent to a chemical
analysis if charged with an implied-consent offense. Any law enforcement officer who has
reasonable grounds to believe that the person charged has committed the implied-consent offense
may obtain a chemical analysis of the person.
Before any type of chemical analysis is administered the person charged shall be taken before
a chemical analyst authorized to administer a test of a person's breath or a law enforcement officer
Page 2 House Bill 1091-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
who is authorized to administer chemical analysis of the breath, who shall inform the person
orally and also give the person a notice in writing that:of the following implied-consent advisory:
(1) You have been charged with an implied-consent offense. Under You have
consented to a chemical analysis under the implied-consent law, you can law.
If you choose to withdraw your consent and refuse any test, but your drivers
license will be revoked for one year and could be revoked for a longer period
of time under certain circumstances, and an officer can compel you to be tested
under other laws.
…
(4) Your driving privilege will be revoked immediately for at least 30 days if you
refuse any test or the test result is 0.08 or more, 0.04 or more if you were
driving a commercial vehicle, or 0.01 or more if you are under the age of 21.a
judicial official determines there is probable cause for the implied-consent
offense charge.
…
(a1) Meaning of Terms. – Under this section, an "implied-consent offense" is an offense
involving impaired driving, a violation of G.S. 20-141.4(a2), or an alcohol-related offense made
subject to the procedures of this section. A person is "charged" with an offense if the person is
arrested for it or if criminal process for the offense has been issued. The term "judicial official"
is as defined in G.S. 15A-101.
…
(i) Right to Chemical Analysis before Arrest or Charge. – A person stopped or
questioned by a law enforcement officer who is investigating whether the person may have
committed an implied consent offense may request the administration of a chemical analysis
before any arrest or other charge is made for the offense. Upon this request, the officer shall
afford the person the opportunity to have a chemical analysis of his or her breath, if available, in
accordance with the procedures required by G.S. 20-139.1(b). The request constitutes the
person's consent to be transported by the law enforcement officer to the place where the chemical
analysis is to be administered. Before the chemical analysis is made, the person shall confirm the
request in writing and shall be notified:notified of all of the following:
(1) That the test results will be admissible in evidence and may be used against
you in any implied consent offense that may arise;arise.
(2) Your driving privilege will be revoked immediately for at least 30 days if the
test result is 0.08 or more, 0.04 or more if you were driving a commercial
vehicle, or 0.01 or more if you are under the age of 21.you are charged with
an implied-consent offense and a judicial official determines there is probable
cause for the charge.
…."
SECTION 3.(c) G.S. 20-16.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-16.5. Immediate civil license revocation for certain persons charged with
implied-consent offenses.
…
(b) Revocations for Persons Who Refuse Chemical Analyses or Who Are Charged With
Certain Implied-Consent Offenses. – A person's driver's license is subject to revocation under
this section if:if all of the following criteria are met:
(1) A law enforcement officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person
has committed an offense subject to the implied-consent provisions of G.S.
20-16.2;G.S. 20-16.2.
(2) The person is charged with that offense as provided in G.S.
20-16.2(a);G.S. 20-16.2(a).
House Bill 1091-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) The law enforcement officer and the chemical analyst comply with the
procedures of G.S. 20-16.2 and G.S. 20-139.1 in requiring the person's
submission to or procuring a chemical analysis; andanalysis.
(4) The person:A judicial official determines there is probable cause for the
implied-consent offense charge.
a. Willfully refuses to submit to the chemical analysis;
b. Has an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more within a relevant time
after the driving;
c. Has an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more at any relevant time after
the driving of a commercial motor vehicle; or
d. Has any alcohol concentration at any relevant time after the driving
and the person is under 21 years of age.
(b1) Precharge Test Results as Basis for Revocation. – Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection (b), a person's driver's license is subject to revocation under this section if:if all of the
following criteria are met:
(1) The person requests a precharge chemical analysis pursuant to G.S. 20-16.2(i);
andG.S. 20-16.2(i).
(2) The person has:
a. An alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more at any relevant time after
driving;
b. An alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more at any relevant time after
driving a commercial motor vehicle; or
c. Any alcohol concentration at any relevant time after driving and the
person is under 21 years of age; and
(3) The person is charged with an implied-consent offense.
(4) A judicial official determines there is probable cause for the implied-consent
offense charge.
…
(e) Procedure if Report Filed with Judicial Official When Person Is Present. – If a
properly executed revocation report concerning a person is filed with a judicial official when the
person is present before that official, the judicial official shall, after completing any other
proceedings involving the person, determine whether there is probable cause to believe that each
of the conditions criteria of subsection (b) has or (b1) of this section has been met. If he the
judicial official determines that there is such probable cause, he the judicial official shall enter
an order revoking the person's driver's license for the period required in this subsection. The
judicial official shall order the person to surrender his or her license and if necessary may order
a law-enforcement officer to seize the license. The judicial official shall give the person a copy
of the revocation order. In addition to setting it out in the order the judicial official shall
personally inform the person of his or her right to a hearing as specified in subsection (g), (g) of
this section, and that his or her license remains revoked pending the hearing. The revocation
under this subsection begins at the time the revocation order is issued and continues until the
person's license has been surrendered for the period specified in this subsection, and the person
has paid the applicable costs. The period of revocation is 30 days, if there are no pending offenses
for which the person's license had been or is revoked under this section. If at the time of the
current offense, the person has one or more pending offenses for which his or her license had
been or is revoked under this section, the revocation shall remain in effect until a final judgment,
including all appeals, has been entered for the current offense and for all pending offenses. In no
event, may the period of revocation under this subsection be less than 30 days. If within five
working days of the effective date of the order, the person does not surrender his or her license
or demonstrate that he or she is not currently licensed, the clerk shall immediately issue a pick-up
order. The pick-up order shall be issued to a member of a local law-enforcement agency if the
Page 4 House Bill 1091-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
law enforcement officer was employed by the agency at the time of the charge and the person
resides in or is present in the agency's territorial jurisdiction. In all other cases, the pick-up order
shall be issued to an officer or inspector of the Division. A pick-up order issued pursuant to this
section is to be served in accordance with G.S. 20-29 as if the order had been issued by the
Division.
(f) Procedure if Report Filed with Clerk of Court When Person Not Present. – When a
clerk receives a properly executed report under subdivision (d)(3) of this section and the person
named in the revocation report is not present before the clerk, the clerk shall determine whether
there is probable cause to believe that each of the conditions criteria of subsection (b) has or (b1)
of this section has been met. For purposes of this subsection, a properly executed report under
subdivision (d)(3) of this section may include a sworn statement by the law enforcement officer
along with an affidavit received directly by the Clerk clerk from the chemical analyst. If he the
clerk determines that there is such probable cause, he the clerk shall mail to the person a
revocation order by first-class mail. The order shall direct that the person on or before the
effective date of the order either surrender his or her license to the clerk or appear before the
clerk and demonstrate that he or she is not currently licensed, and the order shall inform the
person of the time and effective date of the revocation and of its duration, of his or her right to a
hearing as specified in subsection (g), (g) of this section, and that the revocation remains in effect
pending the hearing. Revocation orders mailed under this subsection become effective on the
fourth day after the order is deposited in the United States mail. If within five working days of
the effective date of the order, the person does not surrender his or her license to the clerk or
appear before the clerk to demonstrate that he or she is not currently licensed, the clerk shall
immediately issue a pick-up order. The pick-up order shall be issued and served in the same
manner as specified in subsection (e) of this section for pick-up orders issued pursuant to that
subsection. A revocation under this subsection begins at the date specified in the order and
continues until the person's license has been revoked for the period specified in this subsection
and the person has paid the applicable costs. If the person has no pending offenses for which his
or her license had been or is revoked under this section, the period of revocation under this
subsection is:is for any of the following:
(1) Thirty days from the time the person surrenders his or her license to the court,
if the surrender occurs within five working days of the effective date of the
order; ororder.
(2) Thirty days after the person appears before the clerk and demonstrates that he
or she is not currently licensed to drive, if the appearance occurs within five
working days of the effective date of the revocation order; ororder.
(3) Forty-five days from the time:any of the following times:
a. The person's drivers license is picked up by a law-enforcement officer
following service of a pick-up order; ororder.
b. The person demonstrates to a law-enforcement officer who has a
pick-up order for his or her license that he or she is not currently
licensed; orlicensed.
c. The person's drivers license is surrendered to the court if the surrender
occurs more than five working days after the effective date of the
revocation order; ororder.
d. The person appears before the clerk to demonstrate that he or she is
not currently licensed, if he or she appears more than five working
days after the effective date of the revocation order.
If at the time of the current offense, the person has one or more pending offenses for which his
or her license had been or is revoked under this section, the revocation shall remain in effect until
a final judgment, including all appeals, has been entered for the current offense and for all
pending offenses. In no event may the period of revocation for the current offense be less than
House Bill 1091-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the applicable period of revocation in subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection. When a
pick-up order is issued, it shall inform the person of his or her right to a hearing as specified in
subsection (g), (g) of this section, and that the revocation remains in effect pending the hearing.
An officer serving a pick-up order under this subsection shall return the order to the court
indicating the date it was served or that he or she was unable to serve the order. If the license was
surrendered, the officer serving the order shall deposit it with the clerk within three days of the
surrender.
(g) Hearing before Magistrate or Judge Clerk of Court if Person Contests Validity of
Revocation. – A person whose license is revoked under this section may request in writing a
hearing to contest the validity of the revocation. The request may be made at the time of the
person's initial appearance, or within 10 days of the effective date of the revocation to the clerk
or a magistrate designated by the clerk, and may specifically request that the hearing be
conducted by a district court judge. clerk. The Administrative Office of the Courts must develop
a hearing request form for any person requesting a hearing. Unless a district court judge is
requested, the The hearing must be conducted within the county by a magistrate assigned by the
chief district court judge to conduct such hearings. If the person requests that a district court
judge hold the hearing, the hearing must be conducted within the district court district as defined
in G.S. 7A-133 by a district court judge assigned to conduct such hearings. where the revocation
was issued. If the clerk's office issued the revocation order pursuant to subsection (f) of this
section, then a member of the clerk's office other than the clerk may hold the hearing. The
revocation remains in effect pending the hearing, but the hearing must be held within three
working 10 days following the request if the hearing is before a magistrate or within five working
days if the hearing is before a district court judge. request. The request for the hearing must
specify the grounds upon criteria in subsection (b) or (b1) of this section which the validity of
the revocation is challenged person claims were not met and the hearing must be limited to the
grounds criteria specified in the hearing request. A witness may submit his or her evidence by
affidavit unless he is subpoenaed to appear. or video. Any person who appears and testifies in
person or by video is subject to questioning by the judicial official clerk conducting the hearing,
and the judicial official clerk may adjourn the hearing to seek additional evidence if he or she is
not satisfied with the accuracy or completeness of evidence. The person contesting the validity
of the revocation may, but is not required to, testify in his or her own behalf. Unless contested
by the person requesting the hearing, the judicial official clerk may accept as true any matter
stated in the revocation report. If any relevant condition The clerk shall consider any relevant
information in any files or records concerning the person from the Administrative Office of the
Courts or the Division of Motor Vehicles. The failure of the charging officer or chemical analyst
to testify in person or by video shall not be grounds to rescind the revocation. For any criteria
under subsection (b) is or (b1) of this section that are contested, the judicial official clerk must
find by the greater weight of the evidence that the condition was met in order to sustain the
revocation. At the conclusion of the hearing the judicial official clerk must enter an order
sustaining or rescinding the revocation. The judicial official's clerk's findings are without
prejudice to the person contesting the revocation and to any other potential party as to any other
proceedings, civil or criminal, that may involve facts bearing upon the conditions criteria in
subsection (b) or (b1) of this section considered by the judicial official. clerk. The decision of the
judicial official clerk is final and may not be appealed in the General Court of Justice. If the
hearing is not held and completed within three working 10 days of the written request for a
hearing before a magistrate or within five working days of the written request for a hearing before
a district court judge, hearing, the judicial official clerk must enter an order rescinding the
revocation, unless the person contesting the revocation contributed to the delay in completing the
hearing. If the person requesting the hearing fails to appear at the hearing or any rescheduling
thereof after having been properly notified, he or she forfeits his or her right to a hearing.
…
Page 6 House Bill 1091-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(j) Costs. – Unless the magistrate or judge orders the revocation rescinded, a person
whose license is revoked under this section must pay a fee of one two hundred fifty dollars
($100.00) ($250.00) as costs for the action before the person's license may be returned under
subsection (h) of this section. Fifty percent (50%) of the costs collected under this section shall
be credited to the General Fund. Twenty-five percent (25%) of the costs collected under this
section shall be used to fund a statewide chemical alcohol impairment testing program
administered by the Injury Control Section Forensic Tests for Alcohol Branch of the Chronic
Disease and Injury Section of the Department of Health and Human Services. The remaining
twenty-five percent (25%) of the costs collected under this section shall be remitted to the county
for the sole purpose of reimbursing the county for jail expenses incurred due to enforcement of
the impaired driving laws.
…
(n) Exception for Revoked Licenses. – Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section, if the judicial official required to issue a revocation order under this section determines
that the person whose license is subject to revocation under subsection (b):
(1) Has a currently revoked driver's license;
(2) Has no limited driving privilege; and
(3) Will not become eligible for restoration of his license or for a limited driving
privilege during the period of revocation required by this section,
the judicial official need not issue a revocation order under this section. In this event the
judicial official must file in the records of the civil proceeding a copy of any documentary
evidence and set out in writing all other evidence on which he relies in making his determination.
…."
SECTION 3.(d) G.S. 20-17(a)(2)b. reads as rewritten:
"b. Impaired driving under G.S. 20-138.2, if the driver's alcohol
concentration level was .06 or higher. For the purposes of this
sub-subdivision, the driver's alcohol concentration level result,
obtained by chemical analysis, shall be conclusive and is not subject
to modification by any party, with or without approval by the
court.G.S. 20-138.2."
SECTION 3.(e) This section becomes effective December 1, 2026, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.

PROVISIONS RELATING TO REDUCING UNNECESSARY MOTIONS IN COURT
AND ALLOWING ORAL FLUID DRUG SCREENING TESTS
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 20-16.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-16.3. Alcohol and drug screening tests required of certain drivers; approval of test
devices and manner of use by Department of Health and Human Services; use
of test results or refusal.
(a) When Alcohol or Drug Screening Test May Be Required; Not an Arrest. – A
law-enforcement officer may require the driver of a vehicle to submit to an alcohol screening test
within a relevant time after the driving test, drug screening test, or an alcohol screening test and
a drug screening test, if the officer has:has either of the following:
(1) Reasonable grounds to believe that the driver has consumed alcohol alcohol,
an impairing substance other than alcohol, or alcohol and an impairing
substance other than alcohol, and has:has done either of the following:
a. Committed a moving traffic violation; orviolation.
b. Been involved in an accident or collision; orcollision.
(2) An articulable and reasonable suspicion that the driver has committed an
implied-consent offense under G.S. 20-16.2, and the driver has been lawfully
stopped for a driver's license check or otherwise lawfully stopped or lawfully
House Bill 1091-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
encountered by the officer in the course of the performance of the officer's
duties.
Requiring a driver to submit to an alcohol screening a test in accordance with this section does
not in itself constitute an arrest.
(b) Approval of Alcohol Screening Devices and Manner of Use. – The Department of
Health and Human Services is directed to examine and approve devices suitable for use by
law-enforcement officers in making on-the-scene tests of drivers for alcohol concentration. For
each alcohol screening device or class of devices approved, the Department must adopt
regulations governing the manner of use of the device. For any alcohol screening device that tests
the breath of a driver, the Department is directed to specify in its regulations the shortest feasible
minimum waiting period that does not produce an unacceptably high number of false positive
test results.
(b1) Approval of Oral Drug Screening Devices and Manner of Use. – The Department of
Health and Human Services is directed to examine and approve oral fluid drug screening devices
suitable for use by law-enforcement officers to test drivers for the presence of impairing
substances other than alcohol in oral fluids. For each device or class of devices approved, the
Department must adopt regulations governing the manner of use of the device and the level of
training required for officers who are authorized to use the device. The Department is directed to
specify in its regulations the shortest feasible minimum waiting period that does not produce an
unacceptably high number of false positive test results.
(c) Tests Must Be Made with Approved Devices and in Approved Manner. – No
screening test for alcohol concentration is a valid one under this section unless the device used is
one approved by the Department and the screening test is conducted in accordance with the
applicable regulations of the Department as to the manner of its use.
(d) Use of Screening Test Results or Refusal by Officer. – The fact that a driver showed
a positive or negative result on an alcohol screening test, but not the actual alcohol concentration
result, result of an alcohol screening test, the type of impaired substance present as shown by an
oral fluid drug screening test, or a driver's refusal to submit to a test may be used by a
law-enforcement officer, is admissible in a court, or may also be used by an administrative
agency in determining if there are reasonable grounds for believing:or probable cause to believe
any of the following:
(1) That the driver has committed an implied-consent offense under G.S. 20-16.2;
andG.S. 20-16.2.
(2) That For an alcohol screening test, that the driver had consumed alcohol and
that the driver had in his or her body previously consumed alcohol, but not to
prove a particular alcohol concentration. Negative or low results on the
alcohol screening test may be used in factually appropriate cases by the
officer, a court, or an administrative agency in determining whether a person's
alleged impairment is caused by an impairing substance other than alcohol.
(3) For an oral fluid drug screening test, that the driver had consumed one or more
impairing substances other than alcohol and had in his or her body one or more
previously consumed impairing substances other than alcohol."
SECTION 4.(b) G.S. 20-138.7(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Alcohol Screening Test. – Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an alcohol
screening test may be administered to a driver suspected of violating subsection (a) of this
section, and the results of an alcohol screening test or the driver's refusal to submit may be used
by a law enforcement officer, a court, or an administrative agency in determining if alcohol was
present in the driver's body. No alcohol screening tests are valid under this section unless the
device used is one approved by the Commission for Public Health, Department of Health and
Human Services, and the screening test is conducted in accordance with the applicable
Page 8 House Bill 1091-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
regulations of the Commission Department of Health and Human Services as to the manner of
its use."
SECTION 4.(c) G.S. 15A-534.2(d)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) For any purpose in any proceeding if the test was not performed by a method
approved by the Commission for Public Health Department of Health and
Human Services under G.S. 20-139.1 and by a person licensed to administer
the test by the Department of Health and Human Services."
SECTION 4.(d) This section becomes effective December 1, 2026, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.

PROVISIONS RELATING TO PROHIBITING TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
COMPANY (TNC) DRIVERS FROM DRIVING AFTER CONSUMING ALCOHOL
AND PROVIDING FOR EDUCATION FOR TNC DRIVERS
SECTION 5.(a) G.S. 20-17(a) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(13a) A second or subsequent conviction, as defined in G.S. 20-138.2B(d), of
driving a TNC service vehicle after consuming alcohol under
G.S. 20-138.2B."
SECTION 5.(b) G.S. 20-138.2B reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-138.2B. Operating a school bus, school activity bus, child care vehicle, ambulance,
other EMS vehicle, firefighting vehicle, or law enforcement vehicle vehicle, or
TNC service vehicle after consuming alcohol.
(a) Offense. – A person commits the offense of operating a school bus, school activity
bus, child care vehicle, ambulance, other emergency medical services vehicle, firefighting
vehicle, or law enforcement vehicle vehicle, or TNC service vehicle after consuming alcohol if
the person drives a school bus, school activity bus, child care vehicle, ambulance, other
emergency medical services vehicle, firefighting vehicle, or law enforcement vehicle vehicle, or
TNC service vehicle upon any highway, any street, or any public vehicular area within the State
while consuming alcohol or while alcohol remains in the person's body. This section does not
apply to law enforcement officers acting in the course of, and within the scope of, their official
duties. For purposes of this section, the term "TNC service vehicle" means a motor vehicle being
operated for the purpose of providing a TNC service, as that term is defined in G.S. 20-280.1.
…."
SECTION 5.(c) G.S. 20-280.6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-280.6. Background checks.
(a) Prior to permitting an individual to act as a TNC driver, the transportation network
company must do all of the following:
…
(4) Require the individual to agree in writing that the individual will not act as a
TNC driver while consuming alcohol or at any time while the driver has
remaining in the driver's body any alcohol or controlled substance previously
consumed. This subdivision does not apply to any controlled substance that
was lawfully obtained and taken in therapeutically appropriate amounts.
…
(c) The transportation network company must not permit an individual to act as a TNC
driver if any of the following apply:
…
(2) Has been convicted within the past seven years of driving under the influence
of drugs or alcohol, fraud, sexual offenses, use of a motor vehicle to commit
a felony, or a crime involving property damage, theft, acts of violence, or acts
of terror.
House Bill 1091-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2a) Has been convicted within the past seven years of a second or subsequent
conviction, as defined in G.S. 20-138.2B(d), of driving a TNC service vehicle
after consuming alcohol under G.S. 20-138.2B.
…."
SECTION 5.(d) Transportation network companies (TNCs) shall notify all TNC
drivers providing TNC services at the time of the effective date of this section of the requirement
set forth in G.S. 20-280.6(a)(4), as enacted by subsection (c) of this section. A TNC shall not
permit an individual subject to this subsection to act as a TNC driver if the individual does not
comply with the requirement set forth in G.S. 20-280.6(a)(4) by no later than 12 months from the
effective date of this section.
SECTION 5.(e) Subsection (b) of this section becomes effective December 1, 2026,
and applies to offenses committed on or after that date. The remainder of this section becomes
effective December 1, 2026.

PROVISIONS RELATED TO TRANSPARENCY IN COURT PROCEEDINGS
INVOLVING IMPAIRED DRIVERS
SECTION 6.(a) G.S. 7A-191.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-191.1. Recording of proceeding in which defendant pleads guilty or no contest to
felony in district court.
(a) The trial judge shall require that a true, complete, and accurate record be made of the
proceeding in which a defendant pleads guilty or no contest to a Class H or I felony pursuant to
G.S. 7A-272.(i) any hearing on an infraction conducted pursuant to Article 66 of Chapter 15A of
the General Statutes and (ii) any criminal trial proceeding, including pretrial motions, pleas, plea
bargains, an explanation required under G.S. 20-138.4, taking of evidence, sentencing hearings,
posttrial motions, and requests for limited driving privileges. A proceeding described in this
subsection shall be recorded, both video and audio, using electronic or other mechanical devices
provided by the Administrative Office of the Courts.
(b) It is the duty of the clerk of superior court, or another person designated by the clerk,
to (i) operate the recording device described in subsection (a) of this section and (ii) preserve any
recording produced by the device. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, making
a recording produced in accordance with this section available online in a format that allows a
person to view the recording and download or save the recording to his or her device is allowed
and sufficient to comply with any provision of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes requiring
access to public records. A proceeding described in subsection (a) of this section may be deleted
in accordance with a retention schedule adopted and implemented by the Administrative Office
of the Courts."
SECTION 6.(b) G.S. 7A-109.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-109.2. Records of dispositions in criminal cases; impaired driving integrated data
system.
(a) Each clerk of superior court shall ensure that all records of dispositions in criminal
cases, including those records filed electronically, contain all the essential information about the
case, including the name of the presiding judge and the attorneys representing the State and the
defendant.
(b) In addition to the information required by subsection (a) of this section for all offenses
involving impaired driving as defined by G.S. 20-4.01, all charges of driving while license
revoked for an impaired driving license revocation as defined by G.S. 20-28.2, and any other
violation of the motor vehicle code involving the operation of a vehicle and the possession,
consumption, use, or transportation of alcoholic beverages, the clerk shall include in the
electronic records the following information:
(1) The reasons for any pretrial dismissal by the court.
Page 10 House Bill 1091-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The alcohol concentration reported by the charging officer or chemical
analyst, if any.
(3) The reasons for any suppression of evidence.
(4) The disposition of the charge.
(c) In addition to the information required under subsections (a) and (b) of this section,
for defendants sentenced pursuant to G.S. 20-179, the clerk shall include in the electronic records
(i) each grossly aggravating factor, aggravating factor, and mitigating factor found by the court
and (ii) the level of punishment imposed by the court.
(d) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall publish an annual report no later than
September 1 of each year on its website that includes the information required by this section for
the fiscal year immediately preceding the date of the report. The report shall include statewide
and countywide summaries of the number of charges, dispositions, sentencing factors, and
sentencing levels. Additionally, for each county, the report shall include each type of charge filed
and all of the information required by this section for each charge."
SECTION 6.(c) Section 33 of S.L. 2006-253, as amended by Section 5 of S.L.
2007-493, reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 33. Section 6 becomes effective August 21, 2006, and applies to hearings held
on or after that date. Sections 20.1, 20.2, and the requirement that the Administrative Office of
the Courts electronically record certain data contained in subsection (c) of G.S. 20-138.4, as
amended by Section 19 of this act, become effective after the next rewrite of the superior court
clerks system by the Administrative Office of the Courts. December 1, 2026. Section 22.4
becomes effective December 1, 2006. The remainder of this act becomes effective December 1,
2006, and applies to offenses committed on or after that date."
SECTION 6.(d) The first report required under G.S. 7A-109.2(d), as enacted by
subsection (b) of this section, shall include information from December 1, 2026, through June
30, 2027, and shall be published no later than September 1, 2027.
SECTION 6.(e) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section become effective December
1, 2026, and apply to any hearing, trial, or disposition of charges occurring on or after that date.
The remainder of this section is effective when it becomes law.

PROVISIONS RELATED TO ALLOWING REPEAT OFFENDERS A METHOD TO
PROVE THEIR SOBRIETY AND OBTAIN A LEGAL METHOD TO OPERATE A
VEHICLE
SECTION 7.(a) G.S. 20-19 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a person's license is revoked for
an impaired driving offense and the person is sentenced pursuant to G.S. 20-179, the Division
may conditionally restore the person's license after it has been revoked for at least one year if the
person (i) provides the Division with a certificate of graduation from a Drug Treatment or Driving
While Impaired (DWI) Treatment Court Program established pursuant to Article 62 of Chapter
7A of the General Statutes, (ii) successfully completes a Division-approved driver improvement
clinic described in G.S. 20-16, and (iii) pays, in addition to any other applicable fees, a fee of
twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The twenty-five dollar ($25.00) fee shall be deposited in the
Highway Fund. If the Division restores the person's license, it shall place all of the following
restrictions, requirements, and conditions on the person for the duration of the original revocation
period:
(1) A requirement that all registered vehicles owned by that person be equipped
with a functioning ignition interlock system in accordance with
G.S. 20-17.8(c1).
(2) A restriction that the person may operate only a motor vehicle equipped with
a functioning ignition interlock system of a type approved by the
House Bill 1091-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Commissioner that is set to prohibit driving with an alcohol concentration of
greater than 0.02.
(3) A requirement that the person personally activate the ignition interlock system
before driving the motor vehicle.
In lieu of an ignition interlock system, the Division may impose a requirement that the person
prove abstention from the consumption of alcohol by use of a continuous alcohol monitoring
system approved under G.S. 15A-1343.3. The provider of the continuous alcohol monitoring
system shall send reports prepared in accordance with this subsection to the Division.
In addition, the Division may place other reasonable restrictions, requirements, and
conditions on the person for the duration of the original revocation period."
SECTION 7.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2026.

REVISION RELATED TO THE OFFENSE OF AIDING OR ABETTING THE SALE TO
OR PURCHASE BY UNDERAGE PERSONS OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
SECTION 8.(a) G.S. 18B-302(c)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) By Person over Lawful Age. – Any Except as otherwise provided in this
subdivision, any person who is over the lawful age to purchase and who aids
or abets another in violation of subsection (a), (a1), or (b) of this section is
guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Any person who is over the lawful age to
purchase and who aids or abets a person under the lawful age to purchase in
violation of subsection (a), (a1), or (b) of this section is guilty of a Class F
felony if the person under the lawful age to purchase consumed the alcoholic
beverage involved in the violation and serious bodily injury to the person
under lawful age or another results that was proximately caused by the
consumption of the alcoholic beverage. For purposes of this subdivision, the
term "serious bodily injury" is as defined in G.S. 14-32.4."
SECTION 8.(b) G.S. 18B-302.1(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) A violation of G.S. 18B-302(c)(2) is either a Class 1 misdemeanor. misdemeanor or
a Class F felony. Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 15A-1340.23, if the court imposes a
sentence that does not include an active punishment, the court must include among the conditions
of probation a requirement that the person pay a fine of at least five hundred dollars ($500.00) as
authorized by G.S. 15A-1343(b)(9) and a requirement that the person complete at least 25 hours
of community service, as authorized by G.S. 15A-1343(b1)(6). If the person has a previous
conviction of this offense in the four years immediately preceding the date of the current offense,
and the court imposes a sentence that does not include an active punishment, the court must
include among the conditions of probation a requirement that the person pay a fine of at least one
thousand dollars ($1,000) as authorized by G.S. 15A-1343(b)(9) and a requirement that the
person complete at least 150 hours of community service, as authorized by
G.S. 15A-1343(b1)(6)."
SECTION 8.(c) This section becomes effective December 1, 2026, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.

SEVERABILITY CLAUSE, CRIMINAL SAVINGS CLAUSE, AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9.(a) If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 9.(b) Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of
this act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for
this act remain applicable to those prosecutions.
Page 12 House Bill 1091-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 9.(c) Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 1091-First Edition Page 13